Maryland, session 2025, HB1023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
16–103.
(a) Except as specifically provided in this title, a riparian owner may not be
deprived of any right, privilege, or enjoyment of riparian ownership that the riparian owner
had prior to July 1, 1970.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1023*

HOUSE BILL 1023
(b) The provisions of this title do not transfer the title or ownership of any land
or interest in land.
(C) ANY FAST LAND CREATED UNDER A TIDAL WETLANDS LICENSE SHALL
BE DESCRIBED BY METES AND BOUNDS.
16–206.
(A) (1) FOLLOWING THE COMPLETION OF ANY IMPROVEMENTS
CONSISTING OF SHORELINE STABILIZATION MEASURES AUTHORIZED UNDER §
16–201(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PRECISELY UPDATE THE
LANDWARD BOUNDARIES OF THE RELEVANT WETLANDS.
(2) THE LANDWARD BOUNDARIES OF THE WETLANDS SHALL BE
SHOWN ON SUITABLE MAPS OR AERIAL PHOTOGRAPHS ON A SCALE OF 1 INCH TO 200
FEET.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.